Massachusetts, session 194th, S1988.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out in line 787 the following words:- “permanent and total disability,
and who by reason of such disability have received assistance in acquiring ''specially adapted
housing'' under laws administered by the Veterans Administration to the amount of ten thousand
dollars of the taxable valuation of real property or the sum of $1,500, whichever would result in
an abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due, provided, that such real estate is
occupied as his domicile by such person, and provided, further, that if said property be greater
than a single family house then only that value of so much of said house as is occupied by said
person as his domicile or a proportionate part of $1,500, whichever would result in an abatement
of the greater amount of actual taxes due, shall be exempted”
of 2

and inserting in place thereof the following:- “100 percent service-connected permanent,
and total disability, may receive a full property tax exemption on the real property that the
veteran resides in as his/her primary residence, provided, that such real estate is owned or deeded
in the name of the qualified veteran or his or her spouse.”
of 2